Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB200.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 150.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in the following subsections of this section, and subject to
administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter, no person,
resident, or nonresident shall do any act authorized by any kind of license or
permit or assist in any way any person in doing any act provided for in this
chapter with respect to wildlife unless he or she holds the kind of license or
permit, resident or nonresident, that authorizes the act.
(b) It shall be the specific purpose of this chapter to prohibit the taking or
pursuing of any wildlife, protected or unprotected, or the fishing in any stream
or body of water whether public or private, without first procuring the license
provided for in KRS 150.175, except to the extent as may be otherwise
provided in this section.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person, resident or
nonresident, eighteen (18) years of age or older shall not be required to take
a hunter education course in order to obtain a license or permit issued by
the department under this chapter.
(2) A person under sixteen (16) years of age may, without a sport fishing license, take
fish by angling, or take minnows by the use of a minnow seine, minnow trap, or dip
net.
(3) A person under twelve (12) years of age shall be exempt from being required to
obtain a sport hunting or sport trapping license as required by this chapter.
(4) The resident owner of farmlands or his or her spouse or dependent children shall,
without procuring any sport hunting or sport fishing licenses, have the right to take
fish or hunt during the open season, except trapping, on farmlands of which they are
bona fide owners. Tenants or their dependent children residing upon these
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/23/2025 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 367
farmlands shall have the same privilege.
(5) Residents or nonresidents observing and participating in field trials, training
exercises, or other competitions as authorized by the department may observe and
participate without obtaining a hunting or guide's license so long as game is not
taken.
(6) Any resident serviceman on furlough of more than three (3) days in this state may,
without any Kentucky sport hunting or sport fishing licenses, do any act authorized
by the licenses, but while so doing he or she shall carry on his or her person proper
identification and papers showing his or her furlough status.
(7) Landowners, their spouses or dependent children, or their designee who must be
approved by the commissioner, who kill or trap on their lands any wildlife causing
damage to the lands or any personal property situated thereon shall not be required
to have a hunting or trapping license and may do so during periods other than the
open season for the particular species without a tag and dispose of the carcass on-
site. Tenants, their spouses, their dependent children, or other persons approved by
the commissioner, shall also have the same privilege. Upon destruction of any
wildlife by the above-specified individuals, the act shall be reported to a game
warden within twenty-four (24) hours of the kill. Individuals wishing to transport
the carcass from the property upon which it was killed shall contact personnel of the
department to request a disposal tag or other authorization. Inedible parts from
wildlife taken under the authorization of this section shall not be utilized for any
purpose and shall be destroyed or left afield. The department shall promulgate
administrative regulations establishing procedures for the designee appointment
process, including request and approval deadlines.
(8) If a reciprocal agreement is entered into by the commissioner, with the approval of
the commission, and promulgated as an administrative regulation by the department
and similar action is taken by the appropriate authority in Missouri, Tennessee,
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/23/2025 8:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 367
Virginia, West Virginia, Indiana, Ohio, or Illinois, persons holding a resident or
nonresident fishing or a resident or nonresident hunting license issued in these
states shall be permitted to perform the acts authorized by the license upon certain
contiguous waters and land areas adjacent to the common boundaries of the above-
mentioned states and the State of Kentucky. A resident of the State of Kentucky
shall purchase a proper Kentucky license to conform with the reciprocal agreement.
(9) Any member of the Kentucky Army or Air National Guard, active duty or Reserve
Component, in any branch in the United States Armed Forces that is based in the
Commonwealth of Kentucky, shall have the right to take fish or hunt on any
military property belonging to the Commonwealth without procuring any sport
hunting or sport fishing license[.
(10) A person not otherwise exempted from hunter safety education or from procuring
any sport hunting or sport fishing license shall be exempt from the department-
sanctioned live-fire exercise component of the hunter education course requirement
if he or she:
(a) Is a current member of the Armed Forces of the United States;
(b) Has served in the Armed Forces of the United States and was discharged or
released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable; or
(c) Is a peace officer certified pursuant to KRS 15.380 to 15.404].
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/23/2025 8:53 AM Jacketed